Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Article 1. Generally

Cross references. —

For Wyoming Critical
Access/Rural Hospital Endowment Challenge Program, see §§

35-1-1001

et seq.

§ 18-8-101.
Definitions.

As used in W.S.

18-8-102

through

18-8-109

the words:

“County hospital” and “county memorial hospital” mean any institution, place, building or agency in which any accommodation is maintained, furnished or offered for the hospitalization of the sick, injured or care of any person requiring or receiving chronic or convalescent care, including public health centers, community mental health centers and other types of hospitals and centers including but not limited to general, tuberculosis, mental and chronic disease hospitals, medical facilities and related facilities;

“Medical facilities” includes but is not limited to diagnostic or treatment centers, rehabilitation facilities and nursing homes, as those terms are defined in the federal act Public Law 482, 83 congress, July 12, 1954, (C. 471, sec. 4(c)–(f), 68 Stat. 465-466);

“Related facilities” means but is not limited to laboratories, outpatient departments, nurses homes, nurses training facilities and central service facilities operated in connection with hospitals, but does not include any facility furnishing primarily domiciliary care.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 116, § 1; 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 2010, ch. 82, § 1; 2018 ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2010 amendment,

substituted “18-8-109” for “18-8-108” in the introductory language of (a).

Laws 2010, ch. 82, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2010.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (a)(ii), deleted “(42 U.S.C., § 291i)” at the end.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

The version of 42 U.S.C. § 29li, referred to in paragraph (a)(ii) above, was omitted by Act, Aug. 18, 1964, P.L. 88-443, 78 Stat. 447.

Cited

in

Bd. of County Comm'rs v. Geringer, 297 F.3d 1108, 2002 U.S. App. LEXIS 15353 (10th Cir. 2002).

§ 18-8-102.
Prerequisites to appointment of board of trustees; indebtedness authorized for construction; annual tax levy for maintenance.

When the board of county commissioners has received sufficient guaranties that not less than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000.00) is available for constructing, acquiring or equipping a county hospital, wing or portion of a building suitable for operation of a county hospital so arranged as to be capable of future enlargement, or where a county has acquired a hospital valued at not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00), it shall appoint a nonpartisan board of trustees of the hospital, none of which shall be a county commissioner or an employee of the county hospital.

A county indebtedness may be created and county bonds authorized and issued for the construction, acquisition and equipment of the hospital in the manner then provided by law for the creation of indebtedness and the issuance of bonds for the construction of a courthouse and jail. When the hospital has been constructed or acquired and equipped the board of county commissioners shall annually levy a sufficient tax on all the taxable property in the county to provide for the maintenance of the hospital or wing or portion thereof. The tax shall be levied and collected as other county taxes and the amount collected shall be set apart as the county memorial hospital fund. No money shall be expended from the fund without the approval of the board of county commissioners.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 88, §§ 1, 2; 1919, ch. 89, § 1; C.S. 1920, §§ 1607, 1608; Laws 1925, ch. 19, §§ 1, 2; 1929, ch. 79, § 1; R.S. 1931, §§ 29-1001, 29-1002; C.S. 1945, §§ 26-701, 26-702, 26-707; W.S. 1957, §§ 18-315, 18-316, 18-322; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1981, ch. 143, § 1; 1998, ch. 87, § 1.

Constitutionality of chapter. —

This section and §§

18-8-102

,

18-8-104

to

18-8-107

do not violate art. 3, § 1, Wyo. Const., providing that the legislative power shall be vested in a senate and house of representatives since this provision is not operative in all cases. The power granted to administrative boards to adopt rules, bylaws and regulations reasonably adapted to carry out the purpose or object for which they are created is not an improper delegation of legislative authority prohibited by the constitution. Board of Trustees v. Pratt, 72 Wyo. 120, 262 P.2d 682,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1953).

Nor do they violate art. 3, § 37, Wyo. Const., providing that the legislature shall not delegate to any special commissioner, private corporation or association any power to perform any municipal functions, because the creation and existence of the hospital is not a municipal function. It is rather a matter of statewide concern, and under the exclusive control of the legislature, so that the latter may make such provisions with reference thereto as it deems advisable. Board of Trustees v. Pratt, 72 Wyo. 120, 262 P.2d 682,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1953).

Power of board to adopt rules and regulations implied. —

This section and §§

18-8-102

,

18-8-104

to

18-8-107

do not by express words confer the power on the board to adopt rules and regulations and if it has the power to do so, it must be implied. These sections constitute the board of trustees as a body corporate with the power to sue and to be sued and expressly provide that the management and control of the hospital in question shall be vested in the board of trustees of the hospital. Hence a board of trustees had the power to make reasonable rules and regulations defining the conditions under which physicians might avail themselves of the facilities of the hospital. Board of Trustees v. Pratt, 72 Wyo. 120, 262 P.2d 682,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1953).

Establishment and maintenance of memorial hospitals is governmentalfunction of the county. —

To establish and maintain these memorial hospitals is not a distinctive governmental function of the city or town, rather, of the county. Bondurant v. Board of Trustees, 354 P.2d 219,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 1960).

Governmental agency is immune from liability from torts committedin connection with such operation. —

As a general proposition a governmental unit or agency is immune from liability from torts committed in connection with operating a hospital, when operated in the performance of a governmental function, and these memorial hospitals are so operated. Bondurant v. Board of Trustees, 354 P.2d 219,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 1960).

Immunity even though power is exercised voluntarily. —

The fact that the county was not required to establish and maintain a hospital, but voluntarily exercised that power does not deprive it of governmental immunity. The maintenance of the county hospital was for a purpose essentially public and for the general and common good of the inhabitants of the county, and therefore a governmental function. Bondurant v. Board of Trustees, 354 P.2d 219,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 1960).

Applied

in

State v. Hambrick, 65 Wyo. 1, 196 P.2d 661,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(1948).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Bd. of Comm'rs v. Snyder, 30 Wyo. 468, 222 P. 40,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(1924); Bd. of County Comm'rs v. Geringer, 297 F.3d 1108,

2002 U.S. App. LEXIS 15353

(10th Cir. 2002).

Law reviews. —

See “Administration of the General Property Tax in Wyoming,” 4 Wyo. L.J. 227.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Immunity of county from liability for damages and tort in operating hospital, 25 ALR2d 203, 18 ALR4th 858.

§ 18-8-103.
Authority to establish fund for improvements; revenues derived from taxation and from memorial hospital fund.

The board of county commissioners of any county having a county memorial hospital may establish a fund of a certain amount to be raised within a certain number of years for the purpose of constructing improvements, equipping improvements already erected or for purchasing land for the county memorial hospital. The fund shall be created and added to from taxation as provided by W.S.

18-8-102

and from any funds in the county memorial hospital fund remaining unexpended at the end of any fiscal year exclusive of funds maintained as reserve for depreciation and the cash reserve fund authorized by W.S.

16-4-105

. The fund shall be expended as provided in W.S.

18-8-102

(b).

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 108, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 18-317; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

substituted “16-4-105” for “9-534.”

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Cited

in

Bd. of County Comm'rs v. Geringer, 297 F.3d 1108, 2002 U.S. App. LEXIS 15353 (10th Cir. 2002).

§ 18-8-104.
Hospital generally under control of board of trustees; appointment, powers and duties of trustees; incorporation; use of funds for erection of hospital; term of lease; consolidation of hospitals; acquisition of land; removal of board member; filling of vacancies.

The erection, management and control of the county memorial hospital, county memorial hospital fund and all property and funds received for the benefit of the hospital shall be by a board of trustees composed of at least five (5) but not more than eleven (11) competent and responsible citizens of the county appointed by the board of county commissioners. The number of members of any board of trustees shall be an odd number determined by the county commissioners. The first board of trustees, or additional members to a board of trustees, as soon as appointed shall draw lots for the purpose of determining the term of each member of the board. Up to two (2) members of the original board or additional members of the board shall serve for a term of one (1) year, up to two (2) for a term of two (2) years, up to two (2) for a term of three (3) years, up to two (2) for a term of four (4) years and up to two (2) for a term of five (5) years after their appointment. Terms thereafter shall be five (5) years, consecutively staggered. Each trustee shall serve until the first Monday of July following the expiration of their term and the board of county commissioners annually at their meeting in June shall appoint a successor to the trustee or trustees whose term expires. As soon as the original board has determined the terms of its members they shall organize by electing a president, secretary and treasurer of the board. As soon as they are organized they shall file with the county clerk and the secretary of state a certificate showing their organization, for which filing no fee or charge shall be paid. Upon filing the certificate the board of trustees is a body corporate with power to sue and be sued under the name of “Board of Trustees of the Memorial Hospital of . . . . . County”. No individual member of the board of trustees is personally liable for any action or procedure of the board. The corporation has perpetual existence and it is not necessary to file any other or further certificate than that filed upon the original organization of the board of trustees.

Annually upon the appointment of a new member of the board, the trustees shall meet and organize by electing a president, secretary and treasurer. Each member of the board shall serve without compensation and the treasurer of the board shall give bond in such amount and with such sureties as approved by the board of county commissioners conditioned for the faithful performance of his duties and the full accounting for all monies received as treasurer. The board may allow and pay to the secretary such reasonable compensation as they deem proper for secretarial, accounting and other services required of him in addition to his general duties as a member of the board.

The hospital shall be erected and maintained on lands whose title is in the county or upon which the county has a lease for the term of ninety-nine (99) years. If any county hospital is already owned and maintained by the county, the board of county commissioners may permit the erection of the county memorial hospital upon the grounds already owned and used as a county hospital with any additional grounds deemed necessary and may transfer the management and control of the old hospital to the board of trustees of the memorial county hospital so that the old and the new may be consolidated and operated, controlled and maintained as a single hospital. If any county is without title to sufficient land for the county hospital it may acquire necessary lands by gift, purchase or condemnation under the procedure authorized in exercising the right to eminent domain.

Subject to constitutional limitations, in addition to any other securities the legislature authorizes or has authorized by law for investment, any funds of the hospital may be invested by the hospital board in any security which has been recommended by an investment advisor registered under the Uniform Investment Advisor’s Act of 1940 as amended, or any bank exercising its trust powers, and approved by the board. In approving securities for the investment under this subsection, the board shall be subject to and act in accordance with the provisions of the Wyoming Uniform Prudent Investor Act. The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed to authorize the use of any revenues generated from taxes to engage in any activity authorized under W.S. 18-8-301(a).

The county commissioners may remove any member of the board of trustees for just cause without a public hearing unless the trustee requests a public hearing. Vacancies on the board of trustees shall be filled by the county commissioners for the balance of the unexpired term created by the vacancy.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 88, § 3; 1919, ch. 7, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 1609; R.S. 1931, § 29-1003; Laws 1933, ch. 130, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 26-703; Laws 1953, ch. 169, § 1; 1957, ch. 57, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 18-318; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1985, ch. 52, § 1; 2005, ch. 172, § 1; 2011, ch. 149, § 1; 2012, ch. 49, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to the Uniform Prudent Investors Act, see §

4-10-901

et seq.

As to inspection of hospitals, prisons, asylums, schools and other public institutions by health officers, see §§

35-1-102

,

35-1-222

to

35-1-226

,

35-4-101

to

35-4-103

,

35-4-106

.

As to failure of health officers to perform duties, etc., see §

35-1-103

.

As to duty of hospitals, charitable or penal institutions to report treatment of venereal diseases to state department of health and social services, see §

35-4-132

.

As to provisions for fire escapes, see §§

35-9-501

to

35-9-507

.

The 2005 amendment

added (d).

Laws 2005, ch. 172, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2005.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, added (e).

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, inserted “five (5) years” in the fifth sentence of (a).

Federal law. —

The Uniform Investment Advisor’s Act of 1940 is codified as 15 U.S.C.S. § 80b-1 et seq.

Hospital as municipal corporation. —

It is entirely possible that memorial hospital may be a municipal corporation for some purposes and not for others. Gonzales v. Personal Collection Serv., 494 P.2d 201,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 229

(Wyo. 1972).

The trustees have the power and duty to manage, operate, andcontrol the hospital. —

A municipal corporation has an implied and inherent power to do those things both necessary and proper to directly effect the purposes for which the corporation is created. Gonzales v. Personal Collection Serv., 494 P.2d 201,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 229

(Wyo. 1972).

The power of the trustees

of a county hospital board are general and quite broad with the power to manage, operate and control the hospital and its operations along with the power to sue and be sued. Collins v. Memorial Hosp., 521 P.2d 1339,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 202

(Wyo. 1974).

Reasonable to deny privileges for misstatements, omissions.—

Trustees' policy, which provided that medical staff privileges could be denied if the application for such privileges contained significant misstatements or omissions, was reasonable and nondiscriminatory. Garrison v. Board of Trustees of Memorial Hosp., 795 P.2d 190,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo. 1990), reh'g denied,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(Wyo. Aug. 17, 1990).

Applied

in

State v. Hambrick, 65 Wyo. 1, 196 P.2d 661,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(1948).

Quoted

in

Bondurant v. Board of Trustees, 354 P.2d 219,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 1960).

Cited

in

Bd. of County Comm'rs v. Geringer, 297 F.3d 1108, 2002 U.S. App. LEXIS 15353 (10th Cir. 2002).

§ 18-8-105.
Trustees to receive donations and observe accompanying conditions.

The board of trustees may receive donations of real estate, money or other property in aid of the establishment of the hospital or for the construction of additions or provision of furniture or facilities. They shall permit any donor furnishing means for the construction of any individual portion of the hospital, or for equipping and especially endowing any ward or room therein to name the same in memory of any person chosen by the donor and shall observe the conditions accompanying every gift.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 88, § 4; C.S. 1920, § 1610; R.S. 1931, § 29-1004; C.S. 1945, § 26-704; W.S. 1957, § 18-319; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 18-8-106.
To be maintained as public hospitals; charges for services; when free services to be given; payment for resident indigent hospitalization.

Every county memorial hospital established and maintained as provided by law is a public county hospital. It may charge persons able to pay the same a reasonable price for use of the hospital and its facilities during the time required for proper treatment, and shall furnish free to residents of the county having no means to pay for the same all necessary facilities and maintenance during the time such persons are required to remain there for proper treatment. As long as a county department of public assistance and social services functions in the county as provided by law, the funds in control of the board for hospitalization purposes shall be deemed “means” for payment of resident indigent hospitalization.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 88, § 4; C.S. 1920, § 1610; R.S. 1931, § 29-1004; C.S. 1945, § 26-704; W.S. 1957, § 18-320; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to county departments of public assistance and social services, see §

42-2-101

et seq.

The 2004 amendment

deleted “and the full taxes required under W.S. 42-3 are levied in the county” following “social services functions in the county as provided by law,” and “resulting” preceding “funds in control of the board for hospitalization”; and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

This section does not mean that a county memorial hospital is a charitable organization.

Bondurant v. Board of Trustees, 354 P.2d 219,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 1960).

Board of trustees may determine method of collecting accountsdue. —

As fiduciaries, the board of trustees may properly determine the correct, appropriate, and better way of collecting accounts due. Gonzales v. Personal Collection Serv., 494 P.2d 201,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 229

(Wyo. 1972).

Court may not substitute its judgment for that of board. —

It is improper for any court to substitute its judgment for that of the board of trustees about the proper method for collecting claims for services, which is a part of the management and operation of the hospital and necessary to effect the stated purposes. Gonzales v. Personal Collection Serv., 494 P.2d 201,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 229

(Wyo. 1972).

Assigning claims for collection

rather than creating a department within the hospital or retaining an attorney who would bring suits in the corporate name is not improper in the absence of any proof of abuse. Gonzales v. Personal Collection Serv., 494 P.2d 201,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 229

(Wyo. 1972).

Collection upon contingent fee. —

If a memorial hospital does not have sufficient means for collection of accounts due it may rely upon a contingent fee arrangement and assign the accounts for collection by a collection service without constitutional violation. Gonzales v. Personal Collection Serv., 494 P.2d 201,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 229

(Wyo. 1972).

§ 18-8-107.
Records and reports of trustees.

The board of trustees shall keep a careful record of all its proceedings and keep duplicate vouchers of all expenditures, one (1) set of vouchers to be kept in the office of the secretary of the board of trustees and the other to be filed annually with the board of county commissioners at its June session. The board of trustees shall annually report at the June meeting of the board of county commissioners all the important transactions for the previous twelve (12) months specifying in each report the money received from the county memorial hospital fund, all monies and properties received from other sources, the use and disposition of such monies and other property and such other facts as they deem of public interest or the board of county commissioners may require. The board of trustees shall make monthly reports when required by the board of county commissioners.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 88, § 6; C.S. 1920, § 1612; R.S. 1931, § 29-1006; C.S. 1945, § 26-706; W.S. 1957, § 18-321; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Applied

in

State v. Hambrick, 65 Wyo. 1, 196 P.2d 661,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(1948).

§ 18-8-108.
Authority to enter contract for operation; terms and conditions of contract.

Whenever the board of trustees of a county memorial hospital or special hospital district deems it in the best interests of the county they may with the approval and consent of the board of county commissioners lease or enter into a contract for the operation of the hospital with any person, group, association or corporation. If the board of trustees enters into such a contract or lease the lessee or operator of the hospital shall furnish without charge to residents of the county certified by the county health officer or county department of public assistance and social services as having no means to pay for the same, all necessary facilities and maintenance during the time such persons are required to remain there for proper treatment. The board of trustees shall reimburse the lessee or operator for the hospitalization of indigent persons at rates agreed upon between the board and the operator or lessee, with such reimbursement to be made from funds the board has under its control or made available to it by the board of county commissioners. If a lease or contract is executed the lessee or operator of the hospital shall furnish the board of trustees semiannual reports showing the financial condition of the hospital and all monies received and expended. The board of trustees shall keep the records and make reports required by W.S.

18-8-107

even though the hospital is leased or operated under contract.

A county memorial hospital with the approval and consent of the board of county commissioners, or district hospital with the consent of the board of trustees, may contract with another licensed hospital located within a reasonable distance to share or divide speciality or costly hospital services and equipment, or a county memorial hospital or district hospital with such approval may discontinue or avoid duplication of speciality or costly hospital services and equipment otherwise available to the community served for the purpose of minimizing costs for such hospital services or improving health care.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 152, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 18-323; Laws 1973, ch. 3, § 1; 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Cited

in

Lutheran Hosps. & Homes Soc'y of America v. Yepsen, 469 P.2d 409,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 1970).

§ 18-8-109.
Dissolution.

Subject to the requirements of this section, the trustees of a memorial hospital may vote to dissolve and terminate the county memorial hospital. The plan to dissolve and terminate the county memorial hospital shall provide for the following:

Payment of all bonded and other indebtedness against the county memorial hospital;

Disposition of assets of the county memorial hospital upon dissolution. The assets may either be donated to a nonprofit or governmental hospital or health care facility which provides services to the residents of the county upon such conditions as agreed to by the nonprofit or governmental hospital or health care facility, or retained by the county to be used solely for health care purposes by the county.

Before any plan to dissolve and terminate a county memorial hospital is effective, the plan shall be approved by the board of county commissioners.

If the board of county commissioners approves the dissolution and termination plan, the board of trustees may take all action necessary to effectuate the plan and dissolve and terminate the county memorial hospital.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 146, § 1.